Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 2
CORRECTIONS PRIVATIZATION -
REQUESTS FOR PROPOSALS PROCESS

17-1-201. Duties of department.

The department shall adopt rules and implement a process to issue requests for competitive proposals for the use and development of private contract prisons.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), no later than December 1 of each fiscal year, beginning with the 1996-97 fiscal year, the executive director shall submit a report to the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate concerning the status of contracts in effect, and, with respect to completed prisons, the effectiveness of each private contract prison governed by a contract with the department.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1267, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 837, § 18, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 127, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (SB 17-031), ch. 92, p. 281, § 5, effective August 9.

17-1-202. Requests for competitive proposals and contract requirements.

Before entering into any contract for designing, financing, acquiring, constructing, or operating a private contract prison or any contract for any combination of these functions, the department may issue a request for competitive proposals. Prior to issuing a request for competitive proposals requiring new construction under this section, the department shall notify the capital development committee, established pursuant to section 2-3-1302, C.R.S. The department's rules, at a minimum, shall require that any contract proposed and awarded by the executive director pursuant to this part 2 shall be governed by the following principles:

A contract shall be negotiated with the contractor which, in the determination of the department, is found to be the most qualified and the most competitive under the circumstances; except that a contract for private correctional facilities shall not be executed unless the executive director of the department of corrections determines that the contractor has demonstrated compliance with the following standards:

The qualifications, experience, and management personnel necessary to carry out the terms of the contract. At a minimum, this standard shall prohibit the contractor from employing a person who is required to register pursuant to the provisions of the "Colorado Sex Offender Registration Act", article 22 of title 16, C.R.S., to work in the private correctional facility. In connection with this standard, the contractor shall require applicants for employment to submit a set of fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for a criminal background check as provided in section 17-1-204.

The ability to expedite the location, design, and construction of a private correctional facility; and

The ability to comply with applicable laws, court orders, and national correctional standards.

A contractor shall agree to indemnify the state and the department of corrections, including their officials and agents, against any and all liability including but not limited to any civil rights claims. The department of corrections shall require proof of satisfactory insurance, the amount to be determined by the department of corrections following consultation with the division of insurance in the department of regulatory agencies.

The contractor shall seek, obtain, and maintain accreditation by the association responsible for adopting national correctional standards. In addition, the contractor shall comply with the association's amendments to the accreditation standards upon approval of the amendments by the department of corrections.

The proposed private contract prisons and the management plans for inmates shall meet applicable national correctional standards and the requirements of applicable court orders and state law.

The contractor shall agree to abide by operations standards for correctional facilities adopted by the executive director of the department of corrections.

The contractor shall be responsible for a range of dental, medical, and psychological services and diet, education, and work programs at least equal to those services and programs provided by the department of corrections at comparable state correctional facilities. The work and education programs shall be designed to reduce recidivism.

The executive director shall monitor all private contract prisons. Each contractor shall bear the costs of monitoring associated with out-of-state inmates and shall reimburse the department on a per-inmate basis for out-of-state inmates, but shall not bear the costs of monitoring associated with Colorado inmates.

(1.5) For the purposes of a contract in existence as of April 1, 2004, if a contractor employs a person in a private correctional facility who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to the provisions of the "Colorado Sex Offender Registration Act", article 22 of title 16, C.R.S., the contractor shall ensure that the person does not have unsupervised contact with an inmate on and after April 1, 2004. Failure to comply with the provisions of this subsection (1.5) shall constitute a breach and grounds for termination of the contract.

A contract entered into under this part 2 does not accord third-party beneficiary status to any inmate or to any member of the general public.

Each contract shall include any other requirements the department considers necessary and appropriate for carrying out the purposes of this part 2.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1268, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2000:

IP(1), (1)(d), and (1)(g) amended, p. 837, § 19, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

(1)(a)(I) amended and (1.5) added, p. 231, § 2, effective April 1; (1)(g) amended, p. 753, § 1, effective May 12; IP(1) and IP(1)(a) amended, p. 127, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

IP(1) amended, p. 1059, § 1, effective May 25.

17-1-202.5. Private prison planning process.

In any fiscal year, if the general assembly determines that the amount of moneys credited to the capital construction fund, created in section 24-75-302, C.R.S., is not sufficient to pay for the design and construction of a correctional facility for adult offenders that is deemed necessary to satisfy future prison bed projections and needs, the department may request competitive proposals from private prison providers three years before desired occupancy of the correctional facility. Prior to issuing a request for competitive proposals requiring new construction under this section, the department shall notify the capital development committee, established pursuant to section 2-3-1302, C.R.S.

The department, during the request for competitive proposals process described in subsection (1) of this section, shall determine the level of security, the desired location, and the number of beds necessary for the facility, as well as other criteria applicable to the appropriate conditions of confinement to be maintained at the facility. The department shall be under no obligation or duty to place offenders in a facility covered by this section.

The department in all instances shall ensure that requests for competitive proposals adequately inform prospective contractors that the department will give priority to proposals that satisfy the requirements of section 17-1-202 and that are competitive to the extent they contain terms that are most favorable to the department. The department shall, to the extent possible, also take steps to provide a competitive market environment for prospective contractors and to avoid decreased competition and the creation of a monopoly in the market.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require or permit the department to lend or pledge the credit or faith of the department or of the state in any manner that would violate section 1 of article XI of the Colorado constitution.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 127, § 3, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1059, § 2, effective May 25.

17-1-203. Powers and duties not delegable to contractor.

A contract executed pursuant to this part 2 shall not be construed as authorizing, allowing, or delegating authority to the contractor to:

Choose the correctional facility to which an inmate is initially assigned or subsequently transferred. The contractor may request, in writing, that an inmate be transferred to a facility operated by the department. The executive director and the contractor shall develop and implement a cooperative agreement for transferring inmates between a correctional facility operated by the department and a private contract prison. The department and the contractor must comply with the cooperative agreement.

Develop or adopt disciplinary rules or penalties that differ from the disciplinary rules and penalties that apply to inmates housed in correctional facilities operated by the department of corrections;

Make a final determination on a disciplinary action that affects the liberty of an inmate. The contractor may remove an inmate from the general prison population during an emergency, before final resolution of a disciplinary hearing, or in response to an inmate's request for assigned housing in protective custody.

Make a decision that affects the sentence imposed upon or the time served by an inmate, including a decision to award, deny, or forfeit earned time;

Make recommendations to the state board of parole with respect to the denial or granting of parole or release; however, the contractor may submit written reports to the state board of parole and shall respond to any written request by the state board of parole for information;

Develop and implement requirements that inmates engage in any type of work, except to the extent that those requirements are accepted by the department;

Determine inmate eligibility for any form of release from a correctional facility.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1269, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 838, § 20, effective May 24.

17-1-204. Background checks.

The Colorado bureau of investigation may accept fingerprints of individuals who apply for employment at a private correctional facility and who shall be subject to background checks in accordance with section 17-1-202 (1)(a)(I).

For the purpose of conducting background checks, to the extent provided for by federal law, the Colorado bureau of investigation may exchange with the department state, multistate, and federal criminal history records of individuals who apply for employment at a private correctional facility.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1270, § 1, effective June 5.

17-1-205. Contract termination - control of a correctional facility by the department.

A contractor shall submit a detailed plan for the department to assume temporary responsibility for a private contract prison when the contract between the state and the contractor terminates. The state, through the executive director, may terminate the contract for cause, including but not limited to failure to obtain or maintain facility accreditation, after written notice of material deficiencies and after sixty workdays have been provided to the contractor to correct the material deficiencies. If any event occurs involving the noncompliance with or violation of contract terms and presents a serious threat to the safety, health, or security of the inmates, employees, or the public, the department may temporarily assume responsibility for the private contract prison. In addition, a contractor shall submit a plan for the temporary assumption of operations and purchase of a private contract prison by the department in the event of bankruptcy or the financial insolvency of the contractor. The contractor shall provide an emergency plan to address inmate disturbances, employee work stoppages, strikes, or other serious events. The plan shall comply with applicable national correctional standards. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the state to assume the responsibility for the operation of private contract prisons and costs associated with contractual termination described in this section. If the state chooses, it may assume responsibility upon approval by the general assembly through the enactment of legislation.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1270, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 838, § 21, effective May 24.

17-1-206. Inmates in custody of the department.

The provisions of section 16-11-308, C.R.S., shall apply to inmates placed in a private contract prison pursuant to this part 2.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1271, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 838, § 22, effective May 24.

17-1-206.5. Preparole release and revocation facility - community return-to-custody facility.

On or before December 1, 2001, the department shall issue a request for proposal for the construction and operation of a private contract prison to serve as a preparole and revocation center, that shall be a level III facility, as described in section 17-1-104.3 (1)(a)(III).

The prison described in subsection (1) of this section shall contain at least three hundred beds and incarcerate any of the following:

Inmates who have not been convicted of a crime of violence as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S., and who have no more than nineteen months remaining until such inmate's parole eligibility date;

Inmates who have been convicted of a crime of violence as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S., and who have no more than nine months remaining until such inmate's parole eligibility date; or

Offenders whose parole has been revoked; except that such incarceration shall be for no more than ninety days.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 501, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 2002:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 1499, § 157, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(3) added, p. 2679, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(2)(c) amended and (3) repealed, (HB 17-1326), ch. 394, p. 2029, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (SB 19-143), ch. 286, p. 2660, § 7, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section as enacted by House Bill 01-1370 were renumbered on revision to conform to statutory format.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration in HB 17-1326, see section 1 of chapter 394, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

17-1-207. Applicability of part.

This part 2 shall not apply to the contracts between counties and the department of corrections under which the county agrees to house the backlog of inmates as provided by section 16-11-308.5, C.R.S., which contracts shall be governed by said section. In addition, this part 2 shall not apply to any contract entered into by the department under circumstances where the contract has been reviewed in accordance with section 17-1-105 (2).

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1271, § 1, effective June 5.